Illinois, session 104th, SB2020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-114.1 and 4-109.2 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-114.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-114.1)7    Sec. 3-114.1. Disability pension; line pension - Line of 8duty. 9    (a) If a police officer as the result of sickness, 10accident or injury incurred in or resulting from the 11performance of an act of duty, is found to be physically or 12mentally disabled for service in the police department, so as 13to render necessary his or her suspension or retirement from 14the police service, the police officer shall be entitled to a 15disability retirement pension equal to the greatest of (1) 65% 16of the salary attached to the rank on the police force held by 17the officer at the date of suspension of duty or retirement, 18(2) the retirement pension that the police officer would be 19eligible to receive if he or she retired (but not including any 20automatic annual increase in that retirement pension), or (3) 21the pension provided under subsection (d), if applicable.22    A police officer shall be considered "on duty" while on 23any assignment approved by the chief of the police department   SB2020- 2 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1of the municipality he or she serves, whether the assignment 2is within or outside the municipality.3    (b) If a police officer on disability pension dies while 4still disabled, the disability pension shall continue to be 5paid to his or her survivors in the sequence provided in 6Section 3-112.7    (c) Until July 1, 2025, From and after July 1, 1987, any 8pension payable under this Section shall be at least $400 per 9month, without regard to the fact that the disability or death 10of the police officer occurred prior to that date.11    Beginning July 1, 2025, any pension payable under this 12Section shall be at least $40,000 per year, without regard to 13whether the disability or death of the police officer occurred 14before July 1, 2025.15    If the minimum pension established in Section 3-113.1 is 16greater than the minimum provided in this Section, the Section 173-113.1 minimum controls.18    (d) A disabled police officer who (1) is receiving a 19pension under this Section on or after the effective date of 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly this 21amendatory Act of the 91st General Assembly, and (2) annually 22files with the Fund, within 30 days after that effective date 23and annually thereafter while the pension remains payable, a 24written application for the benefits of this subsection, 25regardless of whether the recipient is engaged in gainful 26employment, including an affidavit stating that the applicant   SB2020- 3 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1has not earned any income from gainful employment during the 2most recently concluded tax year and a copy of his or her most 3recent Illinois income tax return, (3) has service credit in 4the Fund for at least 7 years of active duty, and (4) has been 5receiving the pension under this Section for a period which, 6when added to the officer's total service credit in the Fund, 7equals at least 20 years, shall be eligible to receive an 8annual noncompounded increase in his or her pension under this 9Section, equal to 3% of the original pension.10    The Fund may take appropriate steps to verify the 11applicant's disability and earnings status, and for this 12purpose may request from the Department of Revenue a certified 13copy of the applicant's Illinois income tax return for any 14year for which a benefit under this Section is payable or has 15been paid. 16    The annual increase shall accrue on each anniversary of 17the initial pension payment date, for so long as the pension 18remains payable to the disabled police officer and the 19required annual application is made, except that the annual 20increases under this subsection shall cease if the disabled 21police officer earns income from gainful employment. Within 60 22days after accepting an initial application under this 23subsection, the Fund shall pay to the disabled police officer, 24in a lump sum without interest, the amounts resulting from the 25annual increases that have accrued retroactively.26    This subsection is not limited to persons in active   SB2020- 4 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1service on or after its effective date, but it applies only to 2a pension that is payable under this Section to a disabled 3police officer (rather than a survivor). Upon the death of the 4disabled police officer, the annuity payable under this 5Section to his or her survivors shall include any annual 6increases previously received, but no additional increases 7shall accrue under this subsection.8(Source: P.A. 91-939, eff. 2-1-01.) 9    (40 ILCS 5/4-109.2)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-109.2)10    Sec. 4-109.2. Minimum pension. 11    (a) Beginning January 1, 1984, the minimum disability 12pension granted under Section 4-110 or 4-111, the minimum 13surviving spouse's pension, and the minimum retirement pension 14granted to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 15service, shall be $300 per month, without regard to whether 16the death, disability or retirement of the firefighter 17occurred prior to that date. 18    Beginning July 1, 1987, the minimum retirement pension 19payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 20service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section 214-110 or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's pension 22shall be $400 per month, without regard to whether the death, 23retirement or disability of the firefighter occurred prior to 24that date. 25    Beginning July 1, 1993, the minimum retirement pension   SB2020- 5 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 2service and the minimum surviving spouse's pension shall be 3$475 per month, without regard to whether the firefighter was 4in service on or after the effective date of this amendatory 5Act of 1993. 6    (b) Beginning January 1, 1999, the minimum retirement 7pension payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of 8creditable service, the minimum disability pension payable 9under Section 4-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum 10surviving spouse's pension shall be $600 per month, without 11regard to whether the firefighter was in service on or after 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General 13Assembly. 14    In the case of a pensioner whose pension began before the 15effective date of this amendatory Act and is subject to 16increase under this subsection (b), the pensioner shall be 17entitled to a lump sum payment of the amount of that increase 18accruing from January 1, 1999 (or the date the pension began, 19if later) to the effective date of this amendatory Act. 20    (c) Beginning January 1, 2000, the minimum retirement 21pension payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of 22creditable service, the minimum disability pension payable 23under Section 4-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum 24surviving spouse's pension shall be $800 per month, without 25regard to whether the firefighter was in service on or after 26the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General   SB2020- 6 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1Assembly. 2    (d) Beginning January 1, 2001, the minimum retirement 3pension payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of 4creditable service, the minimum disability pension payable 5under Section 4-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum 6surviving spouse's pension shall be $1000 per month, without 7regard to whether the firefighter was in service on or after 8the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General 9Assembly. 10    (e) Beginning July 1, 2004, the minimum retirement pension 11payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 12service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section 134-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's 14pension shall be $1030 per month, without regard to whether 15the firefighter was in service on or after the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.17    (f) Beginning July 1, 2005, the minimum retirement pension 18payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 19service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section 204-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's 21pension shall be $1060.90 per month, without regard to whether 22the firefighter was in service on or after the effective date 23of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.24    (g) Beginning July 1, 2006, the minimum retirement pension 25payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 26service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section   SB2020- 7 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b14-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's 2pension shall be $1092.73 per month, without regard to whether 3the firefighter was in service on or after the effective date 4of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.5    (h) Beginning July 1, 2007, the minimum retirement pension 6payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 7service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section 84-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's 9pension shall be $1125.51 per month, without regard to whether 10the firefighter was in service on or after the effective date 11of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.12    (i) Beginning July 1, 2008, the minimum retirement pension 13payable to a firefighter with 20 or more years of creditable 14service, the minimum disability pension payable under Section 154-110, 4-110.1, or 4-111, and the minimum surviving spouse's 16pension shall be $1159.27 per month, without regard to whether 17the firefighter was in service on or after the effective date 18of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly. 19    (j) Beginning July 1, 2025, the minimum disability pension 20payable under Section 4-110 shall be $40,000 per year, without 21regard to whether the disability or death of the firefighter 22occurred before July 1, 2025. 23(Source: P.A. 93-689, eff. 7-1-04.) 24    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 25Section 8.49 as follows:   SB2020- 8 -LRB104 12159 RPS 22259 b1    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)2    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 38 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 4the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 5Act of the 104th General Assembly. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.